Hawaii, session 2026, HB2394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $3,150,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-first representative district, as follows: 1.   Ewa Beach Elementary School, Oahu A.  Construction, equipment, and appurtenances for repairs and rehabilitation of an existing air conditioning system serving one instructional building. Construction                           $60,000 Equipment                              $60,000 Other                                  $30,000 Total funding                     $150,000 B.  Plans, design, supplies, and related site preparation for a covered pedestrian walkway, covered basketball court, and basketball court resurfacing and upgrades. Plans and design                       $150,000 Supplies                               $100,000 Construction                           $500,000 Equipment                              $150,000 Other                                  $100,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 C.  Design and construction of an early learning or pre-kindergarten facility. Plans and design                       $120,000 Supplies                               $80,000 Construction                           $400,000 Equipment                              $120,000 Other                                  $80,000 Total funding                          $800,000 2.   Kea'onula Elementary School, Oahu Plans and design, supplies, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for an early or pre-kindergarten facility and for air conditioning system repairs. Plans and design                       $120,000 Supplies                               $120,000 Construction                           $400,000 Equipment                              $120,000 Other                                  $80,000 Total funding                     $800,000 3.   Barbers Point Elementary School, Oahu Plans and design, supplies, construction, equipment for playground improvements, including the installation of two jungle gym structures designed for different grade levels, safety surfacing, and accessibility features. Plans and design                       $20,000 Supplies                               $60,000 Construction                           $80,000 Equipment                              $40,000 Total funding                     $200,000 4.   Ewa Makai Middle School Supplies, Construction, Equipment, and appurtenances for resurfacing of the basketball court and installation of a covered court structure. Supplies                               $40,000 Construction                           $100,000 Equipment                              $40,000 Other                                  $20,000 Total funding                     $200,000 SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $29,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-first representative district, as follows: 1.        Ewa Beach District Recreation Center, Oahu Plans, design, and construction to convert Ewa Puuloa District Park to a multipurpose recreation center. Plans and design                       $2,000,000 Construction                           $18,000,000 Total funding                     $20,000,000 2.        Ewa Beach Sports Complex, Oahu Plans, design, and construction to build a sports complex on the four hundred acres recently turned over from the U.S. Navy to the City and County of Honolulu. Plans and design                       $1,000,000 Construction                           $8,000,000 Total funding                     $9,000,000 SECTION 3.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital project set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital project set forth in section 2 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________